third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/bg_BG.aff
SFX O Y 18
SFX O   е         ето       е
SFX O   е         ия        е
SFX O   е         ията      е
SFX O   й         и         й
SFX O   й         ите       й
SFX O   й         я         й
SFX O   й         ят        й
SFX O   к         ка        к
SFX O   к         кът       к
SFX O   к         ци        к
SFX O   к         ците      к
SFX O   о         овци      о
SFX O   о         овците    о
SFX O   о         ото       о
SFX O   х         си        х
SFX O   х         сите      х
SFX O   х         ха        х
SFX O   х         хът       х

SFX P Y 104
SFX P   а         ат        а
SFX P   а         ейки      а
SFX P   а         ел        а
SFX P   а         ела       а
SFX P   а         елата     а
SFX P   а         ели       а
SFX P   а         елите     а
SFX P   а         елия      а
SFX P   а         елият     а
SFX P   а         ело       а
SFX P   а         елото     а
SFX P   а         ен        а
SFX P   а         ена       а
SFX P   а         ената     а
SFX P   а         ени       а
SFX P   а         ените     а
SFX P   а         ения      а
SFX P   а         еният     а
SFX P   а         ено       а
SFX P   а         еното     а
SFX P   а         ете       а
SFX P   а         ех        а
SFX P   а         еха       а
SFX P   а         ехме      а
SFX P   а         ехте      а
SFX P   а         еше       а
SFX P   а         ещ        а
SFX P   а         еща       а
SFX P   а         ещата     а
SFX P   а         ещи       а
SFX P   а         ещите     а
SFX P   а         ещия      а
SFX P   а         ещият     а
SFX P   а         ещо       а
SFX P   а         ещото     а
SFX P   а         и         а
SFX P   а         ил        а
SFX P   а         ила       а
SFX P   а         илата     а
SFX P   а         или       а
SFX P   а         илите     а
SFX P   а         илия      а
SFX P   а         илият     а
SFX P   а         ило       а
SFX P   а         илото     а
SFX P   а         им        а
SFX P   а         ите       а
SFX P   а         их        а
SFX P   а         иха       а
SFX P   а         ихме      а
SFX P   а         ихте      а
SFX P   а         иш        а
SFX P   я         ейки      я
SFX P   я         ел        я
SFX P   я         ела       я
SFX P   я         елата     я
SFX P   я         ели       я
SFX P   я         елите     я
SFX P   я         елия      я
SFX P   я         елият     я
SFX P   я         ело       я
SFX P   я         елото     я
SFX P   я         ен        я
SFX P   я         ена       я
SFX P   я         ената     я
SFX P   я         ени       я
SFX P   я         ените     я
SFX P   я         ения      я
SFX P   я         еният     я
SFX P   я         ено       я
SFX P   я         еното     я
SFX P   я         ете       я
SFX P   я         ех        я
SFX P   я         еха       я
SFX P   я         ехме      я
SFX P   я         ехте      я
SFX P   я         еше       я
SFX P   я         ещ        я
SFX P   я         еща       я
SFX P   я         ещата     я
SFX P   я         ещи       я
SFX P   я         ещите     я
SFX P   я         ещия      я
SFX P   я         ещият     я
SFX P   я         ещо       я
SFX P   я         ещото     я
SFX P   я         и         я
SFX P   я         ил        я
SFX P   я         ила       я
SFX P   я         илата     я
SFX P   я         или       я
SFX P   я         илите     я
SFX P   я         илия      я
SFX P   я         илият     я
SFX P   я         ило       я
SFX P   я         илото     я
SFX P   я         им        я
SFX P   я         ите       я
SFX P   я         их        я
SFX P   я         иха       я
SFX P   я         ихме      я
SFX P   я         ихте      я
SFX P   я         иш        я
SFX P   я         ят        я

SFX Q Y 93
SFX Q   а         ал        а
SFX Q   а         ала       а
SFX Q   а         алата     а
SFX Q   а         али       а
SFX Q   а         алите     а
SFX Q   а         алия      а
SFX Q   а         алият     а
SFX Q   а         ало       а
SFX Q   а         алото     а
SFX Q   а         ат        а
SFX Q   а         ата       а
SFX Q   а         атата     а
SFX Q   а         ати       а
SFX Q   а         атите     а
SFX Q   а         атия      а
SFX Q   а         атият     а
SFX Q   а         ато       а
SFX Q   а         атото     а
SFX Q   а         ах        а
SFX Q   а         аха       а
SFX Q   а         ахме      а
SFX Q   а         ахте      а
SFX Q   а         е         а
SFX Q   а         ел        а
SFX Q   а         ела       а
SFX Q   а         елата     а
SFX Q   а         ели       а
SFX Q   а         елите     а
SFX Q   а         елия      а
SFX Q   а         елият     а
SFX Q   а         ело       а
SFX Q   а         елото     а
SFX Q   а         ем        а
SFX Q   а         ете       а
SFX Q   а         ех        а
SFX Q   а         еха       а
SFX Q   а         ехме      а
SFX Q   а         ехте      а
SFX Q   а         еш        а
SFX Q   а         еше       а
SFX Q   а         и         а
SFX Q   я         ейки      я
SFX Q   я         ели       я
SFX Q   я         елите     я
SFX Q   я         ен        я
SFX Q   я         ена       я
SFX Q   я         ената     я
SFX Q   я         ени       я
SFX Q   я         ените     я
SFX Q   я         ения      я
SFX Q   я         еният     я
SFX Q   я         ено       я
SFX Q   я         еното     я
SFX Q   я         ете       я
SFX Q   я         еше       я
SFX Q   я         и         я
SFX Q   я         ил        я
SFX Q   я         ила       я
SFX Q   я         илата     я
SFX Q   я         или       я
SFX Q   я         илите     я
SFX Q   я         илия      я
SFX Q   я         илият     я
SFX Q   я         ило       я
SFX Q   я         илото     я
SFX Q   я         им        я
SFX Q   я         ите       я
SFX Q   я         их        я
SFX Q   я         иха       я
SFX Q   я         ихме      я
SFX Q   я         ихте      я
SFX Q   я         иш        я
SFX Q   я         ял        я
SFX Q   я         яла       я
SFX Q   я         ялата     я
SFX Q   я         ялия      я
SFX Q   я         ялият     я
SFX Q   я         яло       я
SFX Q   я         ялото     я
SFX Q   я         ят        я
SFX Q   я         ях        я
SFX Q   я         яха       я
SFX Q   я         яхме      я
SFX Q   я         яхте      я
SFX Q   я         ящ        я
SFX Q   я         яща       я
SFX Q   я         ящата     я
SFX Q   я         ящи       я
SFX Q   я         ящите     я
SFX Q   я         ящия      я
SFX Q   я         ящият     я
SFX Q   я         ящо       я
SFX Q   я         ящото     я
